Georgia statutes. TITLE 29 Guardian and Ward
Article 6 Alternative or Successor Guardians

29-4-50.
Resignation of guardian; required showing; alternative guardian; individuals entitled to notice; hearing.

A guardian or the duly authorized guardian, conservator, or attorney in fact of a guardian, acting on behalf of the guardian, may resign upon petition to the court, showing to the satisfaction of the court that:

The guardian is unable to continue serving due to age, illness, infirmity, or other good cause;

Greater burdens have devolved upon the office of guardian than those that were originally contemplated or should have been contemplated when the guardian was qualified and the additional burdens work a hardship upon the guardian;

Disagreement exists between the ward and the guardian or between the guardian and the conservator in respect of the guardian’s care of the ward, which disagreement and conflict appear to be detrimental to the ward;

The resignation of the guardian will result in or permit substantial financial benefit to the ward; or

The resignation would not be disadvantageous to the ward.

The petition for resignation shall include the name of a suitable person who is willing to accept the guardianship.

The court shall appoint legal counsel for the ward and personal service of the petition for resignation shall be made upon the ward and the ward’s legal counsel. Service shall be made by first-class mail to the conservator of the ward, if any, and to the following persons whose whereabouts are known and who must be persons other than the resigning guardian or the proposed successor guardian:

The spouse of the ward; and

All adult children of the ward; or

If there is no adult child, then at least two adults in the following order of priority:

Lineal descendants of the ward;

Parents and siblings of the ward; and

Friends of the ward.

If, after such hearing as the court deems appropriate, the court is satisfied that the petition for the resignation of the guardian and the appointment of the successor guardian should be granted, the court shall enter an order appointing the successor guardian in accordance with the provisions of Code Section 29-4-61 and accepting the resignation, subject to the resigning guardian turning over to the successor guardian or conservator all property of the ward held by the guardian.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-4-50

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 60, § 29/HB 95.

29-4-51.
Appointment of successor guardian; notice to interested individuals; hearing; order.

In the event of the death of a guardian, and upon the petition of an interested person or on the court’s own motion, the court shall appoint a successor guardian. The court shall appoint legal counsel for the ward and personal service of the petition shall be made upon the ward and the ward’s legal counsel. Notice shall be given by first-class mail to the conservator of the ward, if any, the personal representative of the deceased guardian, if any, and to the following persons whose whereabouts are known and who must be persons other than the proposed successor guardian:

The spouse of the ward; and

All adult children of the ward; or

If there is no adult child, then at least two adults in the following order of priority:

Lineal descendants of the ward;

Parents and siblings of the ward; and

Friends of the ward.

After such hearing as the court deems appropriate, the court shall enter an order appointing a successor guardian in accordance with the provisions of Code Section 29-4-61, requiring the personal representative of the deceased guardian to turn over to the successor guardian all property of the ward held by the guardian.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-4-51

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-4-52.
Revocation or suspension of guardianship; investigation; impact on other proceedings.

Upon the petition of any interested person or whenever it appears to the court that good cause may exist to revoke or suspend the letters of a guardian or to impose sanctions, the court shall cite the guardian to answer the charge. The court shall investigate the allegations and may require such accounting as the court deems appropriate. The court may appoint a temporary substitute guardian for the ward during the investigation.

Upon investigation, the court may, in the court’s discretion:

Revoke or suspend the guardian’s letters;

Require additional security;

Reduce or deny compensation to the guardian or impose any other sanction or sanctions as the court deems appropriate; and

Issue any other order as in the court’s judgment is appropriate under the circumstances of the case.

The revocation or suspension of letters of guardianship shall not abate any action pending for or against the guardian. The successor guardian shall be made a party to the action against the guardian in the manner provided in Code Section 9-11-25.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-4-52

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2004, “the guardian. The” was substituted for “the guardian The” in subsection (c).

29-4-53.
Breach of fiduciary duty by guardian.

If a guardian commits a breach of fiduciary duty or threatens to commit a breach of fiduciary duty, a ward or an interested person on behalf of the ward shall have a cause of action as appropriate to:

Recover damages;

Compel performance of the guardian’s duties;

Enjoin the commission of a breach of fiduciary duty; or

Compel the redress of a breach of fiduciary duty by payment of money or otherwise.

When the ward’s assets are misapplied and can be traced into the hands of persons who have notice of the misapplication, a trust shall attach to the assets.

The provision of remedies for breach of fiduciary duty by this Code section does not prevent resort to any other appropriate remedy provided by statute or common law.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-4-53

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-4-54.
Statute of limitations.

All actions against a guardian, except on the guardian’s bond, shall be brought within six years of the termination of the guardianship of the ward, except as provided in Code Section 9-3-90.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-4-54

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.